lexc/noun/enhuazez2.lexc
!!!enhuazez2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Pronoun

+Ess  +Tem 
!+Dis +Soc
!+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
!+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

!+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl  +Ade +All +Dat +Del
+Ela  +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub  +Ter
!+Fac +Acc +Sup +Cau 
      
§uue§ 
§oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ 
§b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Pron;

LEXICON Pron
amaz:ama AddPron1;
az:a AddPron1;
emez:eme AddPron1;
ez:e AddPron1;
mindama AddPron1;
mindaz:minda AddPron1;
mindeme AddPron1;
mindez:minde AddPron1;
ugyanaz:ugyana AddPron1;
ugyanez:ugyane AddPron1;


LEXICON AddPron1
[stem]+Pronoun:0     Case2;

LEXICON Case2
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
!+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
!+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^vv§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ddig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§kor             #;    ! kor
